Maryland, session 2026, HB1506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–135.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MASTER PLANNED COMMUNITY” MEANS A
LARGE–SCALE, COMPREHENSIVE RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT THAT INTEGRATES
HOMES, COMMERCIAL SPACES, AND AMENITIES SUCH AS DOG PARKS, HIKING AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1506*

HOUSE BILL 1506
BIKING TRAILS, POOLS, AND SPORT COURTS AND FUNCTIONS IN A SIMILAR MANNER
TO MUNICIPALITIES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MASTER PLANNED COMMUNITY,
INCLUDING A SENIOR AGE–RESTRICTED COMMUNITY, THAT PROVIDES SERVICES
SIMILAR TO THOSE OFFERED BY MUNICIPALITIES FOR MULTIPLE INDIVIDUAL
CONDOMINIUMS.
(C) AN INITIAL CAPITAL CONTRIBUTION OR SIMILAR FEE TO BE PAID AT
CLOSING BY A NEW UNIT OWNER OTHER THAN AN INITIAL UNIT OWNER MAY NOT
EXCEED THREE TIMES THE AMOUNT OF MONTHLY ASSESSMENTS PAID BY AN
EXISTING UNIT OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE CLOSING.
(D) THE RESALE CERTIFICATE, PACKAGE, OR DISCLOSURE STATEMENT
SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE FEE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
LABELED AS:
(I) A NEW OWNER FEE;
(II) AN INITIATION FEE; OR
(III) A CAPITAL CONTRIBUTION FEE;
(2) THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(3) ANY OTHER FEE REQUIRED FOR SETTLEMENT.
11B–120.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MASTER PLANNED COMMUNITY” MEANS A
LARGE–SCALE, COMPREHENSIVE RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT THAT INTEGRATES
HOMES, COMMERCIAL SPACES, AND AMENITIES SUCH AS DOG PARKS, HIKING AND
BIKING TRAILS, POOLS, AND SPORT COURTS AND FUNCTIONS IN A SIMILAR MANNER
TO MUNICIPALITIES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MASTER PLANNED COMMUNITY,
INCLUDING A SENIOR AGE–RESTRICTED COMMUNITY, THAT PROVIDES SERVICES
SIMILAR TO THOSE OFFERED BY MUNICIPALITIES FOR MULTIPLE INDIVIDUAL
CONDOMINIUMS.

HOUSE BILL 1506 3
(C) AN INITIAL CAPITAL CONTRIBUTION OR SIMILAR FEE TO BE PAID AT
CLOSING BY A NEW LOT OWNER OTHER THAN AN INITIAL PURCHASER OF THE LOT
MAY NOT EXCEED THREE TIMES THE AMOUNT OF MONTHLY ASSESSMENTS PAID BY
AN EXISTING LOT OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE CLOSING.
(D) THE RESALE CERTIFICATE, PACKAGE, OR DISCLOSURE STATEMENT
SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE FEE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
LABELED:
(I) A NEW OWNER FEE;
(II) AN INITIATION FEE; OR
(III) A CAPITAL CONTRIBUTION FEE;
(2) THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(3) ANY OTHER FEE REQUIRED FOR SETTLEMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.